Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-902
Legislative intent.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that there is a present and growing need to develop services which will lessen and reduce the trauma of domestic abuse. It is the intent of the Protection from Domestic Abuse Act to provide abused family and household members necessary services including shelter, counseling, social services, and limited medical care and legal assistance.

Laws 1978, LB 623, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 829, § 2.